Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Chapter 21 Merger, Share Exchange and Conversion
48-21-113. Surrender of charter upon conversion.

Whenever a domestic business corporation has adopted and approved, in the manner required by this chapter, a plan of entity conversion providing for the corporation to be converted to a foreign unincorporated entity, articles of charter surrender shall be executed on behalf of the corporation by any officer or other duly authorized representative. The articles of charter surrender shall set forth:

The name of the corporation;

A statement that the articles of charter surrender are being filed in connection with the conversion of the corporation to a foreign unincorporated entity;

A statement that the conversion was duly approved by the shareholders in the manner required by this chapter and the charter;

The jurisdiction under the laws of which the survivor will be organized; and

If the survivor will be a nonfiling entity, the address of its executive office immediately after the conversion.

The articles of charter surrender shall be delivered by the corporation to the secretary of state for filing together with the required filing fee. The articles of charter surrender shall take effect on the effective time provided in § 48-11-304.

Acts 2012, ch. 1051, § 39.

48-21-114. Effect of entity conversion.

When a conversion under § 48-21-111 takes effect:

All title to real and personal property, both tangible and intangible, of the converting entity remains in the survivor without reversion or impairment;

All obligations and liabilities of the converting entity continue as obligations and liabilities of the survivor;

An action or proceeding pending against the converting entity continues against the survivor as if the conversion had not occurred;

In the case of a survivor that is a filing entity, its charter or public organic document and its private organic document become effective;

In the case of a survivor that is a nonfiling entity, its private organic document becomes effective;

The shares or interests of the converting entity are reclassified into shares, interests, other securities, obligations, rights to acquire shares, interests, or other securities, or into cash or other property in accordance with the plan of conversion; and the shareholders or interest holders of the converting entity are entitled only to the rights provided to them under the terms of the conversion and to any dissenters' rights they may have under chapter 23 of this title or under the applicable organic law of the converting entity if it is other than a corporation; and

The survivor is deemed to:

Be incorporated or organized under and subject to the organic law of the converting entity for all purposes;

Be the same corporation or unincorporated entity without interruption as the converting entity; and

Have been incorporated or otherwise organized on the date that the converting entity was originally incorporated or organized.

When a conversion of a domestic business corporation to a foreign other entity becomes effective, the surviving entity is deemed to:

Appoint the secretary of state as its agent for service of process in a proceeding to enforce the rights of shareholders who exercise dissenters' rights in connection with the conversion; and

Agree that it will promptly pay the amount, if any, to which such shareholders are entitled under chapter 23 of this title.

A shareholder who becomes subject to owner liability for some or all of the debts, obligations, or liabilities of the survivor shall be personally liable only for those debts, obligations, or liabilities of the survivor that arise after the effective time of the articles of entity conversion.

The owner liability of an interest holder in an unincorporated entity that converts to a domestic business corporation shall be as follows:

The conversion does not discharge any owner liability under the organic law of the unincorporated entity to the extent any such owner liability arose before the effective time of the articles of entity conversion;

The interest holder shall not have owner liability under the organic law of the unincorporated entity for any debt, obligation, or liability of the corporation that arises after the effective time of the articles of entity conversion;

The organic law of the unincorporated entity shall continue to apply to the collection or discharge of any owner liability preserved by subdivision (d)(1), as if the conversion had not occurred; and

The interest holder shall have whatever rights of contribution from other interest holders are provided by the organic law of the unincorporated entity with respect to any owner liability preserved by subdivision (d)(1), as if the conversion had not occurred.

The converting entity shall not be required to wind up its affairs or pay its liabilities and distribute its assets, and such conversion shall not be deemed to constitute a dissolution of such entity.

The interests of the interest holders of the converting entity, unless otherwise agreed, shall be cancelled and become of no effect whatsoever, with respect to the survivor, and the former holders of such interests shall be entitled only to the rights provided in the plan of conversion or the organic documents for the conversion of shares into interests in the survivor.

A conversion shall take effect upon the date the articles of conversion are filed, as provided in § 48-21-112, or on such later date as may be specified in the plan of conversion.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, this section and § 48-21-109 shall have no effect on the application of title 67 and other state and federal tax statutes. Any tax consequences of the conversion as referenced herein shall continue to be controlled by applicable state and federal tax statutes as they may be amended from time to time.

Acts 2012, ch. 1051, § 39.

48-21-115. Abandonment of entity conversion.

Unless otherwise provided in a plan of entity conversion of a domestic business corporation, after the plan has been adopted and approved as required by § 48-21-111, and at any time before the entity conversion has become effective, it may be abandoned by the board of directors without action by the shareholders.

If an entity conversion is abandoned after articles of entity conversion or articles of charter surrender have been filed with the secretary of state but before the entity conversion has become effective, a statement that the entity conversion has been abandoned in accordance with this section, executed by an officer or other duly authorized representative, shall be delivered to the secretary of state for filing, together with the required filing fee, prior to the effective date of the entity conversion. Upon filing, the statement shall take effect and the entity conversion shall be deemed abandoned and shall not become effective.

Acts 2012, ch. 1051, § 39.

48-21-116. Nonprofit conversion.

A domestic business corporation may become a domestic nonprofit corporation pursuant to a plan of nonprofit conversion.

A domestic business corporation may become a foreign nonprofit corporation if the nonprofit conversion is permitted by the laws of the foreign jurisdiction. Regardless of whether the laws of the foreign jurisdiction require the adoption of a plan of nonprofit conversion, the foreign nonprofit conversion shall be approved by the adoption by the domestic business corporation of a plan of nonprofit conversion in the manner provided in this section.

The plan of nonprofit conversion must include:

The terms and conditions of the conversion;

The manner and basis of reclassifying the shares of the corporation following its conversion into memberships, if any, or securities, obligations, rights to acquire memberships or securities, cash, other property, or any combination of the foregoing;

Any desired amendments to the charter of the corporation following its conversion; and

If the domestic business corporation is to be converted to a foreign nonprofit corporation, a statement of the jurisdiction in which the corporation will be incorporated after the conversion.

The plan of nonprofit conversion may also include a provision that the plan may be amended prior to filing articles of nonprofit conversion, except that subsequent to approval of the plan by the shareholders the plan may not be amended to change:

The amount or kind of memberships or securities, obligations, rights to acquire memberships or securities, cash, or other property to be received by the shareholders under the plan;

The charter as it will be in effect immediately following the conversion, except for changes permitted by § 48-20-102; or

Any of the other terms or conditions of the plan if the change would adversely affect any of the shareholders in any material respect.

Terms of a plan of nonprofit conversion may be made dependent upon facts objectively ascertainable outside the plan in accordance with § 48-11-301.

If any debt security, note or similar evidence of indebtedness for money borrowed, whether secured or unsecured, or a contract of any kind, issued, incurred or executed by a domestic business corporation before January 1, 2013, contains a provision applying to a merger of the corporation and the document does not refer to a nonprofit conversion of the corporation, the provision shall be deemed to apply to a nonprofit conversion of the corporation until such time as the provision is amended on or subsequent to January 1, 2013.

Acts 2012, ch. 1051, § 39.

48-21-117. Action on a plan of nonprofit conversion.

In the case of a conversion of a domestic business corporation to a domestic or foreign nonprofit corporation:

The plan of nonprofit conversion must be adopted by the board of directors;

After adopting the plan of nonprofit conversion, the board of directors must submit the plan to the shareholders for their approval. The board of directors must also transmit to the shareholders a recommendation that the shareholders approve the plan, unless the board of directors makes a determination that because of conflicts of interest or other special circumstances it should not make such a recommendation, in which case the board of directors must transmit to the shareholders the basis for that determination;

The board of directors may condition its submission of the plan of nonprofit conversion to the shareholders on any basis;

If the approval of the shareholders is to be given at a meeting, the corporation must notify each shareholder of the meeting of shareholders at which the plan of nonprofit conversion is to be submitted for approval. The notice must state that the purpose, or one (1) of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the plan and must contain or be accompanied by a copy or summary of the plan. The notice shall include or be accompanied by a copy of the charter as it will be in effect immediately after the nonprofit conversion;

Unless chapters 11-27 of this title, the charter, or the board of directors acting pursuant to subdivision (3) requires a greater vote or a vote by voting groups, the plan of conversion to be authorized must be approved by each voting group entitled to vote separately on the plan by a majority of all the votes entitled to be cast on the plan by that voting group; and

If any provision of the charter, bylaws, or an agreement to which any of the directors or shareholders are parties, adopted or entered into before January 1, 2013, applies to a merger of the corporation and the document does not refer to a nonprofit conversion of the corporation, the provision shall be deemed to apply to a nonprofit conversion of the corporation until such time as the provision is amended on or subsequent to January 1, 2013.

Acts 2012, ch. 1051, § 39.

48-21-118. Articles of nonprofit conversion.

After a plan of nonprofit conversion providing for the conversion of a domestic business corporation to a domestic nonprofit corporation has been adopted and approved as required by this chapter, articles of nonprofit conversion shall be executed on behalf of the corporation by any officer or other duly authorized representative. The articles shall set forth:

The name of the corporation immediately before the filing of the articles of nonprofit conversion and if that name does not satisfy the requirements of § 48-54-101, or the corporation desires to change its name in connection with the conversion, a name that satisfies the requirements of § 48-54-101; and

A statement that the plan of nonprofit conversion was duly approved by the shareholders in the manner required by this chapter and the charter.

The articles of nonprofit conversion shall have attached a charter that satisfies the requirements of § 48-52-102. Provisions that would not be required to be included in a charter of a domestic nonprofit corporation may be omitted.

The articles of nonprofit conversion shall be delivered to the secretary of state for filing, together with the required filing fee, and shall take effect at the effective time provided in § 48-11-304. The attached charter shall also be delivered to the secretary of state for filing. The fee for filing the charter shall be paid in accordance with § 48-51-303.

Acts 2012, ch. 1051, § 39.

48-21-119. Surrender of a charter upon foreign nonprofit conversion.

Whenever a domestic business corporation has adopted and approved, in the manner required by this chapter, a plan of nonprofit conversion providing for the corporation to be converted to a foreign nonprofit corporation, articles of charter surrender shall be executed on behalf of the corporation by any officer or other duly authorized representative. The articles of charter surrender shall set forth:

The name of the corporation;

A statement that the articles of charter surrender are being filed in connection with the conversion of the corporation to a foreign nonprofit corporation;

A statement that the foreign nonprofit conversion was duly approved by the shareholders in the manner required by this section and the charter; and

The corporation's new jurisdiction of incorporation.

The articles of charter surrender shall be delivered by the corporation to the secretary of state for filing together with the required filing fee. The articles of charter surrender shall take effect on the effective time provided in § 48-11-304.

Acts 2012, ch. 1051, § 39.

48-21-120. Effect of nonprofit conversion.

When a conversion of a domestic business corporation to a domestic nonprofit corporation becomes effective:

The title to all real and personal property, both tangible and intangible, of the corporation remains in the corporation without reversion or impairment;

The liabilities of the corporation remain the liabilities of the corporation;

An action or proceeding pending against the corporation continues against the corporation as if the conversion had not occurred;

The charter of the domestic nonprofit corporation becomes effective;

The shares of the corporation are reclassified into memberships, securities, obligations, rights to acquire memberships, or securities, or into cash or other property in accordance with the plan of conversion, and the shareholders are entitled only to the rights provided in the plan of nonprofit conversion or to any rights they may have under chapter 23 of this title; and

The corporation is deemed to:

Be a domestic nonprofit corporation for all purposes;

Be the same corporation without interruption as the corporation that existed prior to the conversion; and

Have been incorporated on the date it was originally incorporated as a domestic business corporation.

When a conversion of a domestic business corporation to a foreign nonprofit corporation becomes effective, the foreign nonprofit corporation is deemed to:

Appoint the secretary of state as its agent for service of process in a proceeding to enforce the rights of shareholders who exercise dissenters' rights in connection with the conversion; and

Agree that it will promptly pay the amount, if any, to which such shareholders are entitled under chapter 23 of this title.

The owner liability of a shareholder in a domestic business corporation that converts to a domestic nonprofit corporation shall be as follows:

The conversion does not discharge any owner liability of the shareholder as a shareholder of the business corporation to the extent any such owner liability arose before the effective time of the articles of nonprofit conversion;

The shareholder shall not have owner liability for any debt, obligation, or liability of the nonprofit corporation that arises after the effective time of the articles of nonprofit conversion;

The laws of this state shall continue to apply to the collection or discharge of any owner liability preserved by subdivision (c)(1), as if the conversion had not occurred and the nonprofit corporation was still a business corporation; and

The shareholder shall have whatever rights of contribution from other shareholders are provided by the laws of this state with respect to any owner liability preserved by subdivision (c)(1), as if the conversion had not occurred and the nonprofit corporation was still a business corporation.

A shareholder who becomes subject to owner liability for some or all of the debts, obligations, or liabilities of the nonprofit corporation shall have owner liability only for those debts, obligations, or liabilities of the nonprofit corporation that arise after the effective time of the articles of nonprofit conversion.

Acts 2012, ch. 1051, § 39.

48-21-121. Abandonment of a nonprofit conversion.

Unless otherwise provided in a plan of nonprofit conversion of a domestic business corporation, after the plan has been adopted and approved as required by this section, and at any time before the nonprofit conversion has become effective, it may be abandoned by the board of directors without action by the shareholders.

If a nonprofit conversion is abandoned under subsection (a) after articles of nonprofit conversion or articles of charter surrender have been filed with the secretary of state but before the nonprofit conversion has become effective, a statement that the nonprofit conversion has been abandoned in accordance with this section, executed by an officer or other duly authorized representative, shall be delivered to the secretary of state, together with the required filing fee, for filing prior to the effective date of the nonprofit conversion. The statement shall take effect upon filing, and the nonprofit conversion shall be deemed abandoned and shall not become effective.

Acts 2012, ch. 1051, § 39.